src/fst/stems/stems-gen.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in Mohawk language are actions.
!! -----------------------VERBS ---------------------------------------

LEXICON VerbStem
<0:rootStart>   VerbRoots   ;

LEXICON VerbRoots

!!hear 11
<{athonte}:{athonte'n} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{athonte}:{athonte's} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{athonte}:{athonte'ne'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{athonte}:{athonte'on} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
<{atketsko}"@P.CC.Seven@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" > VerbSuffixes; !!get up 2
<{atketsko}"@P.CC.Seven@" "@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@" >  VerbSuffixesPerfect; !!get up 2
!!want; need smth 16
<{atonhwentsyoni}:{atonhwentsyohs} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{atonhwentsyoni}:{atonhwentsyonis} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@" 0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{atonhwentsyoni}:{atonhwentsyohse'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@"  0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{atonhwentsyoni}:{atonhwentsyoni} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@" 0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
<{atskahon}"@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@"> VerbSuffixes; !!dine 7
<{atskahon}"@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@">  VerbSuffixesPerfect; !!dine 7
<{atyer}"@P.CC.Six@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" "@R.RequireNi.On@" "@C.RequireNi@"> VerbSuffixes; !!do 9
<{atyer}"@P.CC.Six@" "@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@" "@R.RequireNi.On@" "@C.RequireNi@">  VerbSuffixesPerfect; !!do 9
!!remind smb 23
<{ehyahrahkwen}:{ehyahrahkwen} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{ehyahrahkwen}:{ehyahrahkwennis} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{ehyahrahkwen}:{ehyahrahkwen'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{ehyahrahkwen}:{ehyahrahkwenni} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
<{ehyahron}"@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" > VerbSuffixes; !!raise; grow 4
<{ehyahron}"@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@" >  VerbSuffixesPerfect; !!raise; grow 4
!!like the taste 13
<{ekahw}:{ekahw} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{ekahw}:{ekahs} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{ekahw}:{ekahwe'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{ekahw}:{eka'on} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
!!hurry 15
<{hsterihen}:{hsterihen} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{hsterihen}:{hsterihen's} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@" 0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{hsterihen}:{hsterihen'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@"  0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{hsterihen}:{hsterihen'on} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@" 0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
!!sleep 12
<{itahw}:{itahw} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{itahw}:{itahs} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{itahw}:{itahwe'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{itahw}:{ita'on} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
!!pity smb 21
<{itehr}:{itenhr} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{itehr}:{itenras} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{itehr}:{itenhre'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{itehr}:{itenron} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
!!pile; to stack smth 3
<{i'tenhyot}:{i'tenhnyoten} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Red@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{i'tenhyot}:{i'tenhnyotha} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Red@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{i'tenhyot}:{i'tenhnyoten'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Red@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{i'tenhyot}:{i'tenyote} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
<{ken}"@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" > VerbSuffixes; !!see smb 18
<{khonni}"@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" > VerbSuffixes; !!cook 1
<{khonni}"@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@" >  VerbSuffixesPerfect; !!cook 1
!!greet; to acknowledge 28
<{nonhweratons}:{nonhweraton} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{nonhweratons}:{nonhweratons} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@" 0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{nonhweratons}:{nonhweraton'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@"  0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{nonhweratons}:{nonhweraton} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@" 0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
<{nonnyahkw}"@P.CC.Three@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@"> VerbSuffixes; !!dance 6
<{nonnyahkw}"@P.CC.Three@" "@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@" "@R.RequireTe.On@" "@C.RequireTe@">  VerbSuffixesPerfect; !!dance 6
<{onni}"@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" > VerbSuffixes; !!make smth 5
<{onni}"@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@" >  VerbSuffixesPerfect; !!make smth 5
!!enjoy doing smth. 14
<{on'wehskwen}:{on'wehskwen} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{on'wehskwen}:{on'wehskwanis} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{on'wehskwen}:{on'wehskwen'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{on'wehskwen}:{on'wehskwani} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
!!make smth. for smb. 26
<{onnyenni}:{onnyen} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{onnyenni}:{onnyennis} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{onnyenni}:{onnyen'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{onnyenni}:{onnyenni} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
!!watch smb 19
<{rohrok}:{aterorok} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{rohrok}:{ateroroks} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{rohrok}:{ateroroke'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{rohrok}:{ateroron} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
<{yer}"@P.CC.Six@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" "@R.RequireNi.On@" "@C.RequireNi@"> VerbSuffixes; !!do smth with smth specific 8
<{yer}"@P.CC.Six@" "@U.VerbType.RedPerfect@" "@R.RequireNi.On@" "@C.RequireNi@">  VerbSuffixesPerfect; !!do smth with smth specific 8
!!work 10
<{yo'ten}:{yo'ten} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" "@R.Command.On@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{yo'ten}:{yo'ten's} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{yo'ten}:{yo'ten'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"   0:punctSuf "@R.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{yo'ten}:{yo'ten'on} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
